Washington statutes.
RCW 36.23.020

New bond may be required.

When the judge or judges of any court, or a majority of them, believe that the clerk of the court does not have a good and sufficient bond on file, or that the bond is not large enough in amount, such judge or judges shall enter an order requiring him or her, within such time as may be specified in the order, to execute and present to them a good and sufficient bond, in such sum as may be fixed by the order. In case of his or her failure to file the bond within ten days from the expiration of the date fixed the judge or judges shall declare the office vacant.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4028; 1963 c 4 s 36.23.020. Prior: 1895 c 53 s 3; RRS s 72.]